Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 660.380 is amended to read:
660.380. (1) The  Prosperity 10,000 Program is established in the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission [ for the following purposes: ]. From funds appropriated to the commission  for the
program, the commission shall  award grants to local workforce development boards to ad-
minister the program for the following purposes:
(a) To provide career coaching, occupational training and job placement services;
(b) To provide wraparound supports and services  that are necessary to facilitate reengagement
in the workforce, including, but not limited to, transportation, child care and rental assistance;
(c) To provide paid work experiences, including stipends and wages and  other income supports
for individuals [ from priority populations ]; and
(d) To support targeted recruitment and engagement efforts.
(2) The goals of the Prosperity 10,000 Program are to:
[(a) Include at least 10,000 total individuals who participate in the program; ]
[(b)] (a) Improve the capacity and responsiveness of the public workforce system in this state
by providing [ assistance for workforce development program navigation, expanding access  to ]
workforce program navigation assistance,  community-based career  counseling and wraparound
supports and [ services, and providing ] opportunities  to earn industry-recognized [ certificates,] cre-
dentials [ and degrees ] through work-based learning [ experiences ];
[(c)] (b) Ensure [ that] workforce programs’  services and benefits  [ available through workforce
programs] are provided to individuals [ from priority populations ];
[(d)] (c) [ Provide increased ] Increase access [ for priority populations ] to workforce programs’
services and benefits [ available through workforce programs ];
[(e)] (d) Ensure that at least 50 percent of the [ individuals who participate in the ] program par-
ticipants are women;
[(f)] (e) Ensure that at least 80 percent of the  [ individuals who participate ] program partic-
ipants successfully complete the program; and
[(g)] (f) Ensure that  at least 75 percent of the [ individuals who participate in the ] program par-
ticipants successfully obtain employment[ ; and ].
[(h) Ensure that at least 75 percent of  the individuals who participate in the program earn at least
$17 per hour. ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1512 (SB 1512-INTRO) Page 1
(3)(a) [ The Prosperity  10,000 Program shall be administered by local workforce development
boards.] In administering the Prosperity 10,000 Program,  the local workforce development boards
shall:
(A) Distribute resources and available funds to nonprofit community-based  organizations, edu-
cational institutions, labor organizations and other workforce service providers to  facilitate the
provision of workforce [ development] services and wraparound supports  [ to individuals who partic-
ipate in the program ];
(B) Coordinate with state  workforce agencies and other workforce partners to expand regional
community-based partnerships [ that work to support and sustain] supporting workforce
[development] services and wraparound supports; [ and]
(C) Connect with businesses and organizations in targeted industry sectors to identify  training
needs and ensure that [ business needs relating to a ] skilled workforce needs are met[ .]; and
(D) Pursue  and advance local workforce development strategies that are consistent with
and responsive to critical workforce shortages and strategic  workforce opportunities as
identified by local workforce development boards in the local plan described in ORS 660.327.
(b) An entity that  collaborates with a local workforce development board to accomplish the
workforce development activities described  under this subsection shall, in accordance with ORS
660.327, participate with local workforce development boards in developing a proposed local plan.
(c) In distributing funds to the entities described  under paragraph (a)(A) of this sub-
section, local workforce development boards shall consider:
(A) How the entity intends to engage with employers in targeted industry sectors to
provide workforce development opportunities;
(B) The entity’s demonstrated experience in delivering workforce development  services
to individuals;
(C) How the entity intends to collaborate with one or  more of the following to increase
accessibility to workforce programs and opportunities:
(i) Workforce service providers, as defined in ORS 660.400;
(ii) Community-based organizations, as defined in ORS 660.390;
(iii) Kindergarten through grade 12 schools;
(iv) Community colleges;
(v) Education and training partners;
(vi) Local workforce development boards;
(vii) Economic development organizations;
(viii) Industry associations;
(ix) Universities, as defined in ORS 660.445; and
(x) Private post-secondary institutions that meet the criteria  set forth in ORS 348.597
(2)(a);
(D) How an entity described under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph  with which an
entity described under paragraph (a)(A) of this  subsection intends to partner possesses spe-
cific qualifications, including organizational and technical capacity, necessary to  carry out
the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section; and
(E) How  best to prioritize opportunities to leverage the use of other funding sources,
including federal funds and private sector contributions, toward workforce  programs and
opportunities.
(4)(a) If an entity receives funds distributed from a local workforce development  board under
this section and provides  paid work experience to individuals who participate in the program es-
tablished under this section, the entity shall:
(A) Notwithstanding ORS 653.025 [ and subsection (2)(h) of this section ], pay  wages to individuals
participating in the program at a rate that is:
(i) Equivalent to an entry-level training wage as determined  by the entity pursuant to paragraph
(b) of this subsection; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1512 (SB 1512-INTRO) Page 2
(ii) In alignment with  the wage progression schedule established by the entity under subpara-
graph (B) of this paragraph;
(B) Establish a wage progression schedule that includes the step progression  requirements and
the rate calculation formula upon which the entity shall make determinations about a participating
individual’s eligibility to increase the individual’s wage rate from  an entry-level training wage to a
wage rate  that is equivalent to the average area wage standard for an hour’s work in the same trade
or occupation in the locality where the labor is performed;
(C) Develop a training plan for individuals participating in the program that includes, at a
minimum:
(i) The entry-level training wage that will be paid to the individual;
(ii) A statement that the individual shall be  paid according to the wage progression schedule
established by the entity, along with a description of the  requirements that the individual must meet
in order to progress to a higher wage rate under the wage progression schedule;
(iii) A statement that the entry-level training wage paid  to the individual may not be less than
the federal minimum wage rate or the applicable state minimum  wage rate, whichever is greater;
and
(iv) A statement explaining that the  entry-level training wage paid to the individual is a mini-
mum standard and that a higher wage rate shall be paid to the individual if so required under other
applicable federal or state laws, regulations or a collective bargaining agreement; and
(D) Provide each individual participating in the program with a  copy of the training plan de-
scribed in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph on the date  on which the individual first begins par-
ticipating in the program.
(b) For purposes of paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection, the entry-level training wage  shall be a
percentage amount of the average area wage standard for an  hour’s work in the same trade or oc-
cupation in the locality where  the labor is performed, but in no event may the entry-level training
wage be less than the applicable state minimum wage rate under ORS 653.025.
(c) Each individual who performs  work for an entity described in this subsection shall be con-
sidered an employee of  the entity for purposes of state wage and hour laws and state laws prohib-
iting employment discrimination and retaliation.
(5)(a) As used in this subsection, “SNAP Employment and Training  Program” means the em-
ployment and training component of the federal Supplemental  Nutrition Assistance Program under
7 U.S.C. 2015(d)(4).
(b) To the extent possible, the Department of Human Services shall:
(A) Incorporate the Prosperity 10,000 Program into the statewide  plan for the SNAP Employ-
ment and Training Program;
(B) Seek federal reimbursement for 50 percent of the  Prosperity 10,000 Program’s costs and for
other eligible activities as reported by the local workforce development boards;
(C) Refer individuals who receive supplemental nutrition assistance under ORS 411.806  to
411.845 to participate in the Prosperity 10,000 Program; and
(D) Distribute moneys received as reimbursement under subparagraph  (B) of this paragraph to
local workforce development boards, not later than 60 days after  the department receives an invoice
that is consistent  with requirements under the SNAP Employment and Training Program, for rein-
vestment in workforce development and wraparound supports and services  provided under the
Prosperity 10,000 Program.
(6) The State Workforce  and Talent Development Board, in consultation with the Committee for
Continuous Improvement, shall:
(a) Oversee the progress of the Prosperity 10,000 Program;
(b) Ensure that program goals are met; and
(c) Identify areas for program improvement.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 660.385 is amended to read:
660.385. [ (1)(a) Not later than 60 days following March 17, 2022, the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission shall distribute the funds specifically  appropriated to the commission under section
Enrolled Senate Bill 1512 (SB 1512-INTRO) Page 3
13, chapter 28, Oregon Laws 2022, to local workforce development boards to administer  the Prosperity
10,000 Program. ]
(1)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall distribute the funds specif-
ically appropriated by the Legislative  Assembly for the purpose of administering the Pros-
perity 10,000 Program to local workforce development boards to carry out such purposes.
(b) The commission shall distribute all moneys received [ from moneys made available under
sections 13 and 14, chapter 28, Oregon Laws 2022, ] to local workforce development boards using the
same formula as required under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C.
3101 et seq.) for the allocation of funds to local workforce development boards.
(2) Each local workforce development board shall compile data on the progress made toward
carrying out the Prosperity 10,000 Program. The boards shall prepare and submit a joint report that
includes data, disaggregated by race, gender and geography, to the commission and the  State
Workforce  and  Talent Development Board no later than October 31 of each year, in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245.
Passed by Senate February 17, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 25, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1512 (SB 1512-INTRO) Page 4